tools/hyphenators/hyph_se.dic
å2l2s2
1åm
å2m2s1
å1n2
å1n2e2
å2n2n1
1å2n1s2
å1o
åpas1
å1p2a
å1p2r
åra2n1
å1r2a
å1r2e
1å2rg
1å1r2i
å2r2s2
å2r2t
år2u1
å1s2
å2s2a
å1s2e2n2
å1s2e
å2s1f2
å2s2i
å2sk
å2s1n2
å2st2
1å2s2u
å1t2a2
åt2a2i1
åt2a2n1
å2t2h
å2t2n2
å2t1r
1å2t1t2
åt1v2i1
å2t2v2
å2t2'
åt1`á2
å2t`
2åv
å1v2i1
å2v1ø
å1å1l
'a1b2e1
'a1b
'2ah
'1al
'2am
'a2n1
2'as1
2'a2t1
'2á
2'ár
'2b
'1b2e1
'1č
'1d2
'1e
'1g
'2h
'1h2a2
2'2i2
'id1
'i2i2n1
'i2i
'1l
'2m
'1m2i2
'2n
'1o
'2or
'1r
's2
't1
'1t2w
2'ž
'1å
2''2
2'´1
'´2n
2'`1
´2a
´2ah
´1al
´an1
´2á1
´2b
´1b2e1
´b2en1
´1d
´1e
´1f
´2g
´2h
´han1
´1h2a
2´i2
´i2i2n1
´i2i
´2m
´1n
2´s
´2s1y
´2t1
2´ž
2´'2
2´´2
2´`1
´`2h
`2a
`1a1b
`2ah
`a2i1
`1al
`2am
`á2r1t
`2b
`1b2e1
`1d
`1e
`1f
`2g
2`1g2e
`1h
`han1
`1h2a
2`i2
`id1
`1i1đ
`2m
`2n
`2n1g2
`1n2o2
`no1b1
`1p2e2
`p2e1r1
2`s
`1š
2`2t1
`t1š1
`1y
2`ž
2`'1
`´1
`´2n
2``1
°c1
°c2eb1
°1c2e
°f1
°1fo2
°f1v2i1
°2f1v
°f1x1
